Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 3. Service on Nonresident Motorists

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

8 Am. Jur. 2d Automobiles and Highway Traffic §§ 935 to 957.

72 C.J.S. Process §§ 73 to 76; 92A C.J.S. Venue § 92.

§ 1-6-301.
Secretary of state deemed attorney for service; continuance of action; costs; record of process; jurisdiction; direction of summons.

The use and operation of a motor vehicle on any street or highway within Wyoming by any person upon whom service of process cannot be made within Wyoming either personally or by service upon a duly appointed resident agent is deemed an appointment of the secretary of state of Wyoming as the operator’s lawful attorney upon whom may be served all legal processes in any proceeding against him, or his personal representative if he be deceased, due to damage or injury to person or property resulting from the operation of a motor vehicle on the streets or highways within this state. Such operation constitutes the operator’s agreement that any process served in any action against him or his personal representative has the same legal force and validity as if served upon him or his personal representative personally within this state. Service shall be made by serving a copy of the process upon the secretary of state or by filing such copy in his office, together with payment of a fee of ten dollars ($10.00). Within ten (10) days after the date of service, notice of such service and a copy of the process shall be served upon the defendant or his personal representative either personally or by certified mail addressed to the last known address of the defendant or his personal representative. The plaintiff shall file with the clerk of the court in which the action is brought an affidavit that he has complied with such requirement.

The court in which the action is pending shall order such continuance as necessary to afford the defendant or his personal representative reasonable opportunity to defend the action. The fee of ten dollars ($10.00) paid by the plaintiff to the secretary of state at the time of service of process shall be taxed as costs in the suit.

The secretary of state shall keep a record of all processes served showing the date and hour of service and shall arrange and index the record to make it readily accessible and convenient for inspection. The district court of the county in which the cause of action arose or the district court of the county in which the plaintiff resides shall have jurisdiction over the action. The clerk of the district court in which the action is commenced may issue summons directed to the sheriff of Laramie county, Wyoming for service upon the secretary of state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 43, § 1; 1945, ch. 11, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 60-1101; Laws 1955, ch. 95, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 1-52; Laws 1963, ch. 20, § 1; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 1981, ch. 47, § 4; 2021 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, substituted "ten dollars ($10.00)" for "three dollars ($3.00)" in (a) and (b).

Construed in pari materia. —

Section

1-39-102

must be read together with §

1-3-116

and this section. Tarter v. Insco, 550 P.2d 905,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1976).

Absence from state of defendant in wrongful death action did not toll statute of limitations,

by reason of the applicability of §

1-3-116

, where the defendant could have been served at any time through substituted service upon the secretary of state. Tarter v. Insco, 550 P.2d 905,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1976).

Where this section authorizes service on the nonresident motorist or the resident motorist who has concealed himself or who has absconded, the tolling statute serves no purpose. Tarter v. Insco, 550 P.2d 905,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1976).

Absence from state in personal injury action. —

Motorist's absence from state did not serve to toll statute of limitations for personal injury action against her, because substituted service of process could have been made upon her within state in accordance with subsection (a) of this section. Ryel v. Anderies, 4 P.3d 193,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 2000).

Failure to make attempt to locate the driver for service of
process. —

Passenger's
use of this section and attempted notice of the suit on the driver
did not satisfy the statutory requirement, as the passenger had information
of a more recent address, failed to make a reasonable attempt to
locate
the driver, and thus, failed to make an initial determination
of whether
substituted service was justified Dirks v. Jimenez, 344 P.3d 262 (Mar. 6, 2015).

Section not restricted to use of public highways or streets.
—

Where broad language, such as that in this section, does not restrict its application to the use of public highways or streets, the service has been upheld when the cause of action arose out of the use and operation of a motor vehicle over or upon any road or street “within” the state, including private roads and roads within military reservations. Yellowstone National Park. Zacharias v. Ippen, 337 F.2d 445, 1964 U.S. App. LEXIS 4113 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1964).

Thus service may be had on nonresident when accident occurred
in Yellowstone National Park. —

Under the broad terms of this section, service may be had on a nonresident when the cause of action arose out of an accident on a road within the Yellowstone National Park. Zacharias v. Ippen, 337 F.2d 445, 1964 U.S. App. LEXIS 4113 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1964).

Applicability to resident defendant.—

Substitute service could be made on a resident motorist who remained in the state but could not be found for personal service; this section reaches “any person” who cannot be personally served within Wyoming. Miller v. Johnson, 639 Fed. Appx. 558, 2016 U.S. App. LEXIS 6069 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2016).

Notice to defendant's insurance company not satisfactory. —

Notice to a defendant motorist's insurance company, standing alone, will not satisfy due diligence. The plaintiff has a duty to exercise due diligence as federal due process requires. The plaintiff cannot expect the insurance company to carry out that duty. Colley v. Dyer, 821 P.2d 565,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(Wyo. 1991).

Address given to investigating authorities reliable. —

Insofar as the “last known address” requirement of this section is concerned, a party may rely upon the address given to investigating authorities. Colley v. Dyer, 821 P.2d 565,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(Wyo. 1991).

Action against nonresident in state court. —

Circuit court had subject matter jurisdiction over insurer's suit seeking to recover damages from nonresidents of Wyoming, not exceeding $7,000, arising from alleged negligent operation of a motor vehicle because circuit courts'
subject matter jurisdiction was governed by Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

5-9-128

, as the granting in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-6-301(c) of jurisdiction to district court of the county in which a cause of action arose or district court of the county in which plaintiff resided addressed venue rather than subject matter jurisdiction.
State Farm Mut. Auto. Ins. Co. v. Kunz, 2008 WY 71, 186 P.3d 378,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 2008).

Action by nonresident against nonresident in federal district
court. —

A resident of Indiana did not consent to suit by a resident of Texas in a federal district court in Wyoming solely because of service under the provisions of this section upon the secretary of state. Weber v. Threlkel, 126 F. Supp. 98, 1954 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2451 (D. Wyo. 1954).

Quoted

in

Midway Oil Corp. v. Guess, 714 P.2d 339,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 473

(Wyo. 1986).

Stated

in

Cook Ford Sales, Inc. v. Benson, 381 P.2d 68,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1963).

Cited

in

Cook Ford Sales, Inc. v. Benson, 392 P.2d 307,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 1964).

Law reviews. —

See note, “Venue of Action Against Non-Resident Motorists,” 1 Wyo. L.J. 130.

See “Legislation,” 1 Wyo. L.J. 133.

See “Commission of a Single Tort as Giving Jurisdiction Over a Foreign Corporation,” 6 Wyo. L.J. 313.

See article, “Wyoming Nonresident Motorist Statute,” 18 Wyo. L.J. 231 (1964).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and application of provisions of Federal Motor Carrier Act requiring designation of agent for service of process, 8 ALR2d 814.

Constitutionality and construction of statute authorizing constructive or substituted service of process on foreign representative of deceased nonresident driver of motor vehicle arising out of accident occurring in state, 18 ALR2d 544.

What is “motor vehicle” or the like within statute providing for constructive or substituted service of process on nonresident motorist, 48 ALR2d 1283.

Who is subject to constructive or substituted service of process under statutes providing for such service on nonresident motorist, 53 ALR2d 1164.

Place or type of motor vehicle accident as affecting applicability of statute providing for constructive or substituted service of process upon nonresident motorist, 73 ALR2d 1351.

Statutory service on nonresident motorists: return receipts, 95 ALR2d 1033.

Validity, construction, and effect of “consent to sue” clauses in uninsured motorist endorsement of automobile insurance policy, 24 ALR4th 1024.